New York, session 2025-2026, A1055.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 223-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 223-a. Minimum uniform investigatory standards. The superintendent 4 of the state police shall promulgate minimum uniform investigatory stan- 5 dards to be implemented when there is a shooting of a civilian by a 6 police officer and shall mandate that such standards must be followed 7 every time there is a shooting of a civilian by a police officer. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00385-01-5